Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-17] Relation to Electronic
Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act. This chapter modifies,
limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce
Act, title 15 U.S.C. section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or
supersede section 101(c) of that Act, title 15 U.S.C. section 7001(c), or
authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b)
of that Act, title 15 U.S.C. section 7003(b). [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next